Wisconsin, session 2025, SB364.
do enact as follows:SB364,11Section 1. 48.65 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB364,2,13248.65 (3) (a) Except as provided in par. (c), before the department may issue a 3license under sub. (1) to a child care center that provides care and supervision for 4 4to 8 12 children, the child care center must pay to the department a biennial fee of 5$60.50. Except as provided in par. (c), before the department may issue a license 6under sub. (1) to a child care center that provides care and supervision for 9 13 or 7more children, the child care center must pay to the department a biennial fee of 8$30.25, plus a biennial fee of $16.94 per child, based on the number of children that 9the child care center is licensed to serve. A child care center that wishes to continue 10a license issued under sub. (1) shall pay the applicable fee under this paragraph by 11the continuation date of the license. A new child care center shall pay the 12applicable fee under this paragraph no later than 30 days before the opening of the 13child care center.SB364,214Section 2. 48.67 of the statutes is renumbered 48.67 (1m), and 48.67 (1m) (a) 15and (d) 1. (intro.), 2. and 3., as renumbered, are amended to read:SB364,3,41648.67 (1m) (a) That all child care center licensees, and all employees and 17volunteers of a child care center, who provide care and supervision for children 18under one year of age receive, before the date on which the license is issued or the 19employment or volunteer work commences, whichever is applicable, training in the 20most current medically accepted methods of preventing sudden infant death 21syndrome. The rules shall provide that any training in those methods that a 22licensee has obtained in connection with military service, as defined in s. 111.32 1(12g), counts toward satisfying the training requirement under this subsection 2paragraph if the licensee demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that 3the training obtained in that connection is substantially equivalent to the training 4required under this subsection paragraph.SB364,3,115(d) 1. (intro.) That all foster parents successfully complete training in the care 6and support needs of children who are placed in foster care that has been approved 7by the department. The training shall be completed on an ongoing basis, as 8determined by the department. The department shall promulgate rules 9prescribing the training that is required under this subsection paragraph and shall 10monitor compliance with this subsection paragraph according to those rules. The 11training shall include training in all of the following:SB364,3,13122. The training under par. (a) subd. 1. shall be available to a kinship care 13provider, as defined in s. 48.40 (1m), upon request of the kinship care provider.SB364,3,15143. For a foster parent receiving an initial license, the training under par. (a) 15subd. 1. shall be completed before the first child is placed with the foster parent.SB364,316Section 3. 48.67 (2m) of the statutes is created to read:SB364,3,191748.67 (2m) In the rules promulgated under sub. (1m), the department shall 18authorize child care centers licensed under s. 48.65 (1) that have sufficient staff and 19space to provide care and supervision for 4 to 12 children or for 13 or more children.SB364,420Section 4. 66.1017 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB364,3,232166.1017 (1) (a) “Family child care home” means a dwelling licensed as a child 22care center by the department of children and families under s. 48.65 where care is 23provided for not more than 8 12 children.SB364,524Section 5. 101.01 (11) (e) of the statutes is created to read:SB364,4,31101.01 (11) (e) A dwelling licensed as a child care center by the department of 2children and families under s. 48.65 where care is provided for not more than 12 3children.SB364,64Section 6. Nonstatutory provisions.SB364,4,185(1) As soon as practicable following the effective date of this subsection, the 6department of children and families shall amend the definition of “family child care 7center” under s. DCF 250.03 (9), Wis. Adm. Code, to mean a facility where a person 8provides care and supervision for less than 24 hours a day for at least 4 and not 9more than 12 children who are not related to the provider; and it shall amend any 10other rules it has promulgated pertaining to family child care centers, as defined 11under s. DCF 250.03 (9), Wis. Adm. Code, to harmonize them with the definition as 12so amended. As soon as practicable following the effective date of this subsection, 13the department of children and families shall amend the definition of “group child 14care center” under s. DCF 251.03 (13), Wis. Adm. Code, to mean a facility where a 15person for less than 24 hours a day provides care and supervision for 13 or more 16children who are not related to the provider; and it shall amend any other rules it 17has promulgated pertaining to group child care centers, as defined under s. DCF 18251.03 (13), Wis. Adm. Code, to harmonize them with the definition as so amended.SB364,719Section 7. Initial applicability.SB364,4,2220(1) This act first applies to an application for a child care center license or for 21a continuation of a child care center license submitted on the effective date of this 22subsection.SB364,4,2323